Maine, session 132, LD838.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to explore savings options for electricity ratepayers through public
financing and ownership of electric transmission and distribution infrastructure.
Page 1 - 132LR1982(01)